Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-603.02
Authorized representative, defined.

Authorized representative shall mean any person designated by the county, city, or village or a joint entity created by the county, city, or village by entering into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act to examine, sign, and approve a lottery worker license application for submission to the department.

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 46.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.